Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.025

Accreditation of schools and colleges—Standards—Assistants for examinations authorized.

The commission shall have authority to grant accreditation to chiropractic schools and colleges.

The commission shall have authority to adopt educational standards which may include standards of any accreditation agency recognized by the office of education of the department of health and human services or its successor agency, or any portion of such standards, as the commission's standards: PROVIDED, That such standards, so adopted, shall contain, as a minimum of on-campus instruction in chiropractic, the following: Principles of chiropractic, two hundred hours; adjustive technique, four hundred hours; spinal roentgenology, one hundred seventy-five hours; symptomatology and diagnosis, four hundred twenty-five hours; clinic, six hundred twenty-five hours: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such standards shall not mandate, as a requirement for either graduation or accreditation, or include in the computation of hours of chiropractic instruction required by this section, instruction in the following: Mechanotherapy, physiotherapy, acupuncture, acupressure, or any other therapy.

The commission shall approve and accredit chiropractic colleges and schools which apply for commission accreditation and approval and which meet to the commission's satisfaction the educational standards adopted by the commission. It shall be the responsibility of the college to apply for accreditation and approval, and of a student to ascertain whether a college or school has been accredited or approved by the commission.

The commission shall have authority to engage assistants in the giving of examinations called for under this chapter.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 110; 1980 c 51 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1980 c 51: "If any provision of this 1980 act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1980 c 51 s 6.]